Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.030

Issuance and execution of warrant.

If the order be made, the clerk shall thereafter, at any time within six months, when requested by the plaintiff, issue such warrant directed to the sheriff, requiring him or her forthwith to abate the nuisance at the expense of the defendant, and return the warrant as soon thereafter as may be, with his or her proceedings indorsed thereon. The expenses of abating the nuisance may be levied by the sheriff on the property of the defendant, and in this respect the warrant is to be deemed an execution against property.

[ 2011 c 336 s 210; Code 1881 s 607; 1877 p 126 s 612; 1869 p 145 s 561; 1854 p 207 s 407; RRS s 945.]